New York, session 2025-2026, S6418.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-17) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-17) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises 6 consumption for a premises which shall be located within two hundred 7 feet of a building occupied as a school, church, synagogue or other 8 place of worship, provided such premises constitute a premises for the 9 sale of food or beverages at retail for consumption on the premises 10 located wholly within the boundaries of the county of Orange in the city 11 of Middletown, bounded and described as follows: 12 ALL that certain plot, piece or parcel of land with the buildings and 13 improvements thereon erected, situate, lying and being in the City of 14 Middletown, County of Orange, State of New York, and being more accu- 15 rately bounded and described as follows: 16 BEGINNING at a point in the easterly line of North Street at the 17 northeasterly building corner which lies on the herein described parcel 18 and at the southwesterly building corner which lies on the lands of 19 Beakes; thence from the said point or place of beginning and following 20 along a common brick party wall and along the line of lands of Beakes, 21 South 62 degrees 17' 25" East a distance of 51.50 feet to a point; 22 thence along the line of lands of City of Middletown and passing through 23 a concrete wall, South 21 degrees 17' 35" West a distance of 16.83 feet EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10684-01-5 S. 6418 2 1 to a point; thence still along the lien of lands of the City of Middle- 2 town and passing along a common brick party wall, North 61 degrees 51' 3 40" West a distance of 54.00 feet to a point in the easterly line of 4 North Street; thence along the easterly line of North Street, North 29 5 degrees 52' 40" East a distance of 16.33 feet to the point or place of 6 BEGINNING. 7 BEING and intended to be the same premises conveyed to Paul Wyman by 8 deed from F.D. Kernochan, Inc., dated May 14, 1997 and recorded in the 9 Orange County Clerk's Office on May 16, 1997, in Liber 4570, page 16. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.